Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-34 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 1

A. Any individual entering through gates used for ingress or
egress to a property designated as an easement shall maintain the
position of the gate upon use.
B. 1. Any individual who violates the provisions of subsection
A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than ninety (90) days,
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
2. Any individual convicted of a second offense shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not more
than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment in a county
jail for not more than one hundred eighty (180) days, or by both
such fine and imprisonment.
3. Any individual convicted of a third or subsequent offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not more than One
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), by imprisonment in a
county jail for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
4. Any individual convicted pursuant to the provisions of this
subsection shall also be liable for damages.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.”
ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 2


Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,

2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. A. TO ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 3

ENGR OSSED HOUSE
BILL NO. 1356 By: Hardin of the House

and

Woods of the Senate




An Act relating to agriculture; creating Kenny’s Law;
defining terms; requiring gates to remain closed at
all times; allowing for certain exceptions;
prescribing penalties for violation; authorizing the
promulgation of rules; providing statement of intent;
providing for noncodification; providing for
codification; and providing an effective date.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as “Kenny’s Law”.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-34 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. “Livestock” means the same as defined in Section 1-3 of
Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 1

2. “Maintenance” means the functional checking, servicing,
repairing, or replacing of necessary infrastructure conducted by the
property owner, utility company, municipality, or state or federal
agency.
B. All gates that are part of an enclosure or barrier designed
to contain livestock shall remain closed at all times, except when:
1. Ingress or egress is in progress; provided, that the ingress
or egress shall be reasonable and not prolonged as to allow persons
to enter and leave without causing containment of livestock to be
compromised;
2. Maintenance is occurring within the property;
3. Livestock are being moved from one area to another; or
4. The livestock owner, utility company, municipality, or any
state or federal agency has a functional reason to access the
enclosed area.
C. A person with or without express permission to access a
livestock or landowner's land shall be in violation of this act if
he or she knowingly and maliciously:
1. Leaves a gate open that is part of an enclosure or barrier
designed to contain livestock on private or public property;
2. Damages any part of a gate that is part of an enclosure or
barrier designed to contain livestock, which compromises the
containment of livestock; or
3. Allows livestock to escape containment.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 2

D. Individuals in violation of this act shall be deemed guilty
of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine
not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each separate
offense or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one
hundred eighty (180) days for each separate offense, or by both such
fine and imprisonment, for the first and second convictions. Third
and subsequent convictions for this violation shall be punished by a
fine not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for
each separate offense or imprisonment in a county jail for not more
than one (1) year for each separate offense, or by both such fine
and imprisonment. Individuals in violation of this section shall
also incur all financial liability from damages caused.
E. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food and Forestry
may promulgate rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
act.
F. The express intent of this law is to protect farmers,
livestock owners, the public, and landowners from malicious acts of
damage, allowance of livestock to escape, and negligence on the part
of others.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1356 Page 4